New York, session 2025-2026, A7060.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 1854 of the public authorities law is amended by 2 adding a new subdivision 27 to read as follows: 3 27. To administer a program, using funds provided for such purpose, to 4 provide grants or loans based on standards and guidelines established by 5 the authority, for the costs related to enabling switching residences 6 with propane or fuel-oil heating systems to efficient electric heat 7 pumps, including energy efficiency measures. 8 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04506-01-5